Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.060

Adjournment of proceedings—Further notice.

The court or judge may, upon application of the petitioner or of any owner or party interested, for reasonable cause, adjourn the proceedings from time to time, and may order new or further notice to be given to any party whose interest may be affected.

[ 1890 p 297 s 3; RRS s 924. Prior: 1888 p 60 s 3.]